Maryland, session 2025, HB0973.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0973*

HOUSE BILL 973
12–503.
(a) (1) The Department shall adopt by regulation, as the Maryland Building
Performance Standards, the International Building Code, including the International
Energy Conservation Code, with the modifications incorporated by the Department under
subsection (b) of this section.
(2) The Department shall adopt each subsequent version of the Standards
within 18 months after it is issued.
(b) (1) Before adopting each version of the Standards, the Department shall:
(i) review the International Building Code to determine whether
modifications should be incorporated in the Standards;
(ii) consider changes to the International Building Code to enhance
energy conservation and efficiency;
(iii) subject to the provisions of paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection,
adopt modifications to the Standards that allow any innovative approach, design,
equipment, or method of construction that can be demonstrated to offer performance that
is at least the equivalent to the requirements of:
1. the International Energy Conservation Code;
2. Chapter 13, “Energy Efficiency”, of the International
Building Code; or
3. Chapter 11, “Energy Efficiency”, of the International
Residential Code;
(iv) accept written comments;
(v) consider any comments received; and
(vi) hold a public hearing on each proposed modification.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph and [§
12–510] §§ 12–503.1 AND 12–510 of this subtitle, the Department may not adopt, as part
of the Standards, a modification of a building code requirement that is more stringent than
the requirement in the International Building Code.
(ii) The Department may adopt energy conservation requirements
that are more stringent than the requirements in the International Energy Conservation
Code, but may not adopt energy conservation requirements that are less stringent than the
requirements in the International Energy Conservation Code.

HOUSE BILL 973 3
(c) The Standards apply to each building or structure in the State for which a
building permit application is received by a local jurisdiction on or after August 1, 1995.
(d) In addition to the Standards, the Department shall:
(1) on or before January 1, 2023, adopt by regulation the 2018
International Green Construction Code; and
(2) adopt each subsequent version of the Code within 18 months after it is
issued.
12–503.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELECTRIC–READY” MEANS THE MORE STRINGENT OF:
(I) ELECTRIC–READY REQUIREMENTS IN THE INTERNATIONAL
ENERGY CONSERVATION CODE, INCLUDING RELEVANT APPENDICES; OR
(II) HAVING ADEQUATE PANEL CAPACITY, DEDICATED
ELECTRIC PANEL SPACE, ELECTRICAL WIRE, ELECTRICAL RECEPTACLES, AND
ADEQUATE PHYSICAL SPACE TO ACCOMMODATE FUTURE INSTALLATION OF
HIGH–EFFICIENCY ELECTRIC APPLIANCES, INCLUDING HEATING, LAUNDRY, WATER
HEATING, COOKING, AND DRYING.
(3) “ENERGY EFFICIENCY” MEANS PERCENTAGE ENERGY USE
REDUCTION WITH REFERENCE TO THE 2006 INTERNATIONAL ENERGY
CONSERVATION CODE, AS CALCULATED FOR MARYLAND CLIMATE ZONES AND
PUBLISHED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY BUILDING ENERGY CODES
PROGRAM AS OF OCTOBER 1, 2025, EXCLUSIVE OF:
(I) RENEWABLE ENERGY PRODUCED AND ELECTRIC VEHICLE
CHARGING PROVIDED AT THE BUILDING’S PREMISES;
(II) UNCONDITIONED FLOOR AREA; AND
(III) PARKING.
(4) “FUEL TYPE” MEANS THE COMBINATION OF ENERGY SOURCES
PLANNED FOR A USE IN A BUILDING, INCLUDING ELECTRICITY AND MIXED FUEL.
(5) (I) “SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENT” MEANS ANY REPAIR,

HOUSE BILL 973
RECONSTRUCTION, REHABILITATION, ALTERATION, ADDITION, OR OTHER
IMPROVEMENT OF A BUILDING OR STRUCTURE, THE COST OF WHICH EQUALS OR
EXCEEDS 50% OF THE REPLACEMENT COST OF THE STRUCTURE BEFORE THE
IMPROVEMENT OR REPAIR IS STARTED.
(II) “SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE
IMPROVEMENT OF A BUILDING:
1. REQUIRED TO CORRECT EXISTING HEALTH,
SANITARY, OR SAFETY CODE VIOLATIONS IDENTIFIED BY A BUILDING OFFICIAL OR
THAT ARE THE MINIMUM NECESSARY TO ENSURE SAFE LIVING CONDITIONS; OR
2. BY ALTERATION OF A HISTORIC STRUCTURE
PROVIDED THAT THE ALTERATION WILL NOT PRECLUDE THE STRUCTURE’S
CONTINUED DESIGNATION AS A HISTORIC STRUCTURE.
(6) “SOLAR–READY” MEANS THE MORE STRINGENT OF:
(I) SOLAR–READY REQUIREMENTS IN THE INTERNATIONAL
BUILDING CODE OR INTERNATIONAL ENERGY CONSERVATION CODE, INCLUDING
RELEVANT APPENDICES; AND
(II) DESIGN, ENGINEERING, AND CONSTRUCTION SO THAT AT
LEAST 40% OF THE ROOF AREA IS:
1. FREE FROM OBSTRUCTIONS; AND
2. CAPABLE OF ACCEPTING THE INSTALLATION OF
SOLAR PANELS.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2025, AS PART OF THE STANDARDS,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
REQUIREMENT THAT NEW BUILDINGS AND SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENTS MEET ALL
LAUNDRY, WATER, AND SPACE HEATING DEMANDS OF THE BUILDING WITHOUT THE
USE OF FOSSIL FUELS;
(II) AN ELECTRIC–READY STANDARD FOR NEW BUILDINGS AND
SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENTS THAT RECEIVE A WAIVER UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(III) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A

HOUSE BILL 973 5
REQUIREMENT THAT NEW BUILDINGS OR SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENTS BE
SOLAR–READY IF THE BUILDING:
1. WILL HAVE 20,000 SQUARE FEET OR MORE OF
CONTINUOUS ROOF SPACE, EXCLUDING THE PARKING AREA; AND
2. WILL BE 20 STORIES OR LESS IN HEIGHT ABOVE
GRADE PLANE.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY GRANT A WAIVER FROM THE
REQUIREMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR:
1. EMERGENCY BACK–UP POWER SYSTEMS FOR NEW
BUILDINGS AND SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENTS; AND
2. NEW BUILDINGS, SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENTS, AND
ADDITIONS SPECIFICALLY DESIGNATED FOR OCCUPANCY BY A COMMERCIAL FOOD
ESTABLISHMENT, LABORATORY, LAUNDROMAT, HOSPITAL, OR CREMATORIUM.
(II) 1. A WAIVER GRANTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE LIMITED TO BUILDING SYSTEMS AND AREAS THAT
CANNOT FEASIBLY USE ENERGY GENERATED FROM A SOURCE OTHER THAN FOSSIL
FUELS.
2. FINANCIAL CONSIDERATIONS ARE NOT A SUFFICIENT
BASIS FOR DETERMINING FEASIBILITY UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH.
(III) A BUILDING OR SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENT THAT IS
GRANTED A WAIVER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL:
1. SEEK TO MINIMIZE EMISSIONS FROM ITS FOSSIL FUEL
USE;
2. MAXIMIZE HEALTH, SAFETY, AND FIRE PROTECTION;
AND
3. BE REQUIRED TO COMPLY WITH THE
ELECTRIC–READY STANDARDS ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(IV) TO ENSURE A WAIVER GRANTED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)

HOUSE BILL 973
OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS STILL NECESSARY, THE WAIVER SHALL BE REVIEWED:
1. EACH TIME THE STANDARDS ARE MODIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
2. BY THE LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT GRANTED THE
WAIVER EACH TIME THE LOCAL JURISDICTION MODIFIES ITS LOCAL AMENDMENTS
UNDER § 12–504 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY
AUTHORIZE A LOCAL JURISDICTION TO WAIVE THE SOLAR–READY REQUIREMENTS
FOR A BUILDING ON A SPECIFIC FINDING THAT:
(I) INCIDENT SOLAR RADIATION AT THE BUILDING SITE IS LESS
THAN 75% OF INCIDENT SOLAR RADIATION AT AN OPEN SITE; OR
(II) SHADOW STUDIES INDICATE THAT 25% OF A BUILDING’S
ROOF AREA WILL BE IN SHADOW.
(4) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT
A LOCAL JURISDICTION FROM PROHIBITING THE USE OF FOSSIL FUELS IN
BUILDINGS OR SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENTS OR ADOPTING ENERGY
CONSERVATION AND SOLAR ENERGY REQUIREMENTS FOR BUILDINGS OR
SIGNIFICANT IMPROVEMENTS THAT ARE MORE STRINGENT THAN THE
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “COVERED BUILDING” MEANS A
COMMERCIAL OR RESIDENTIAL BUILDING WITH A GROSS FLOOR AREA OF LESS THAN
35,000 SQUARE FEET OR MORE, EXCLUDING THE PARKING GARAGE AREA.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO NEW CONSTRUCTION.
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT, AS PART OF THE
STANDARDS, REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING ENERGY CONSERVATION
REQUIREMENTS FOR COVERED BUILDINGS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBSECTION.
(II) IN DEVELOPING THE REGULATIONS, THE DEPARTMENT:
1. A. SUBJECT TO ITEM B OF THIS ITEM, SHALL
ESTIMATE ENERGY EFFICIENCY OUTCOMES OF THE STANDARDS ACCORDING TO
PUBLICATIONS AND METHODS FROM THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY OR ITS
CONTRACTORS; AND

HOUSE BILL 973 7
B. MAY SEEK ADVICE FROM THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
ENERGY, ITS CONTRACTORS, OR SIMILARLY QUALIFIED PARTIES TO MAKE THESE
ESTIMATES; AND
2. SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE STANDARDS AUTHORIZING COMPLIANCE VIA THE
ATTAINMENT OF ENERGY EFFICIENCY CREDITS OR ACHIEVEMENT OF
PERFORMANCE THRESHOLDS, SHALL CALCULATE AND ADOPT CREDITS AND
PERFORMANCE THRESHOLDS IN A MANNER THAT COMPARES SITE ENERGY USE
INTENSITY CHANGES FROM ENERGY EFFICIENCY MEASURES TO A
MARYLAND–SPECIFIC BASELINE MODEL THAT DOES NOT VARY ACCORDING TO FUEL
TYPE OF THE PROPOSED BUILDING FOR RELEVANT BUILDING TYPES.
(4) CREDITS OR PERFORMANCE THRESHOLDS MAY NOT BE
CALCULATED IN A MANNER THAT AUTHORIZES BUILDINGS OF A CERTAIN FUEL TYPE
TO COMPLY WITH THE STANDARDS WHILE ACHIEVING A LOWER ENERGY
EFFICIENCY ON AVERAGE THAN BUILDINGS OF A DIFFERENT FUEL TYPE.
(5) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
REGULATIONS SHALL REQUIRE NEW RESIDENTIAL BUILDINGS LESS THAN FOUR
STORIES ABOVE GRADE PLANE TO ACHIEVE, ON AVERAGE, ENERGY EFFICIENCY
EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN:
(I) 35% FOR BUILDING PERMIT APPLICATIONS RECEIVED
FROM MARCH 1, 2027, THROUGH FEBRUARY 28, 2030, BOTH INCLUSIVE;
(II) 50% FOR BUILDING PERMIT APPLICATIONS RECEIVED
FROM MARCH 1, 2030, THROUGH FEBRUARY 28, 2033, BOTH INCLUSIVE; AND
(III) 65% FOR BUILDING PERMIT APPLICATIONS RECEIVED ON
OR AFTER MARCH 1, 2033.
(6) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND EXCEPT
AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE REGULATIONS SHALL
REQUIRE ALL BUILDINGS, REGARDLESS OF FUEL TYPE, TO ACHIEVE ON AVERAGE
ENERGY EFFICIENCY EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN:
(I) 45% FOR BUILDING PERMIT APPLICATIONS RECEIVED
FROM MARCH 1, 2027, THROUGH FEBRUARY 28, 2030, BOTH INCLUSIVE;
(II) 55% FOR BUILDING PERMIT APPLICATIONS RECEIVED
FROM MARCH 1, 2030, THROUGH FEBRUARY 28, 2033, BOTH INCLUSIVE; AND

HOUSE BILL 973
(III) 65% FOR BUILDING PERMIT APPLICATIONS RECEIVED ON
OR AFTER MARCH 1, 2033.
(7) (I) A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY ADOPT ENERGY
CONSERVATION REQUIREMENTS FOR BUILDINGS THAT ARE MORE STRINGENT THAN
THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) IF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION WHERE A COVERED BUILDING
WILL BE LOCATED HAS ADOPTED ENERGY CONSERVATION REQUIREMENTS MORE
STRINGENT THAN THE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION,
THE BUILDING SHALL BE REQUIRED TO MEET THE MORE STRINGENT
REQUIREMENTS.
(8) IF THE VERSION OF THE STANDARDS IN EFFECT AT THE TIME A
BUILDING PERMIT APPLICATION IS RECEIVED REQUIRES THE BUILDING TO MEET
ENERGY CONSERVATION REQUIREMENTS THAT ARE MORE STRINGENT THAN THE
REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE BUILDING SHALL BE
REQUIRED TO MEET THE MORE STRINGENT REQUIREMENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.